District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.21

Rules for towing and impoundment of vehicles, and vehicle conveyance fees.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules regarding towing and impoundment of vehicles in connection with enforcement of the District’s parking restrictions and to establish the amount of, and implement a system for collecting, a vehicle conveyance fee.

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 505, 25 DCR 1275
Mar. 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-303, § 4(d), 55 DCR 12803
1981 Ed., § 40-704.
1973 Ed., § 40-603.1.
D.C. Law 17-303 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to establish from time to time a reasonable fee to be charged for the cost of storing impounded vehicles. Such storage fee shall not be charged for the first 24 hour period in which a vehicle is impounded.”